Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8434.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-19-39 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-19 entitled "Sentence
and Execution" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-19-39. Criminal street gang enhancement.
(a) “Criminal street gang” means an ongoing organization, association, or group of three
(3) or more persons, whether formal or informal, having as one of its primary activities the
commission of criminal or delinquent acts; having an identifiable name or common identifiable
signs, colors, or symbols; and whose members individually or collectively engage in, or have
engaged in, a pattern of criminal gang activity.
(b) Any person who is convicted of any felony that is knowingly committed for the benefit,
at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang or criminal street gang member,
with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the affairs of a criminal street gang or criminal
conduct by criminal street gang members, in addition to the sentence provided for the commission
of the underlying offense, shall be subject to imprisonment for an additional term of not more than
ten (10) years.
(c) Any person who is convicted of any offense constituting first or second degree murder
that is knowingly committed for the benefit, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal
street gang or criminal street gang member, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the
affairs of a criminal street gang or criminal conduct by criminal street gang members, in addition

to the sentence provided for the commission of the underlying offense, shall be sentenced to an
additional term of imprisonment of ten (10) years.
(c)(d) Whenever it appears that a person may be subject to the enhanced sentence in this
section, the attorney general, in no case later than the first pretrial conference, shall file with the
court a notice specifying that the defendant, upon conviction, is subject to the imposition of
sentencing in accordance with this section.
(d)(e) Upon any plea of guilt or nolo contendere, or verdict or finding of guilt of the
defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing hearing. At the hearing, the court shall permit the
attorney general and the defense to present additional evidence to the jury relevant to the
determination of whether the defendant knowingly committed the offense for the benefit, at the
direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang or criminal street gang member, with
the intent to promote, further, or assist in the affairs of a criminal street gang or criminal conduct
by criminal street gang members. If the jury at the hearing, or in the case of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, the court at sentencing, determines beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant’s
actions were so motivated, he or she shall be sentenced as provided in subsection (b).
(e)(f) This section does not create a separate offense but provides an additional enhanced
sentence for the underlying offense.
(f)(g) The enhanced sentence provided in this section shall run consecutively to the
sentences provided for the underlying offenses.
SECTION 2. Chapter 12-19 of the General Laws entitled "Sentence and Execution" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-19-39.1. Sentencing enhancement for certain firearm related offenses -- NyNy’s
law.
(a) Any person who uses, aids and abets or conspires to use a ghost gun as defined in § 11-
47-2(9), a stolen firearm as defined in § 11-47-5.2, a modified semi-automatic weapon as defined
in § 11-47-8.1, a large capacity feeding device as defined in § 11-47.1-2, a prohibited firearm as
defined in § 11-47.2-1, and during the use of any enumerated firearm, is a prohibited person as
defined in § 11-47-5, is an alien in possession of any firearm as defined in § 11-47-7, possesses or
uses any firearm during the commission of any felony as defined in § 11-47-20.2 or engages in any
drive by shooting in violation of § 11-47-61, resulting in the death of any person and which would
constitute first or second degree murder, shall, in addition to any other penalty imposed, be
imprisoned for a period of five (5) years which shall run consecutively to any other sentence.
(b) This section does not create a separate offense but provides an additional enhanced
sentence for the underlying offense.
LC006291 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006291
========
LC006291 - Page 3 of 4